California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

395.06.

(a) A private employer shall consider a former employee who meets the requirements of subdivision (b) as having been on a leave of absence during any period of the former employee’s active service in the National Guard of any state, and is subject to both of the following:

(1) If the former position was a full-time position, and not a temporary position, the former employer shall restore the former employee to the former position or to a position of similar seniority, status, and pay without loss of retirement or other benefits, unless the employer’s circumstances have so changed as to make it impossible or unreasonable to do so, and shall not discharge the former employee from
 the position without cause within one year after restoring them to the position.

(2) If the position was a part-time position and not a temporary position, the former employer shall restore the former employee to the former position, or to a position of similar seniority, status, and pay, if any exists, and shall not discharge the former employee from the position without cause within one year after restoring them to the position.

(b) To be eligible for the employment protections specified in
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the former employee shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) They are an officer or enlisted member of the National Guard of any state.

(2) They were called to active duty by the Governor of the state where they serve in the National Guard or by the President of the United States.

(3) They received a certificate of satisfactory service in the National Guard of the state where they serve in the National Guard.

(4) They are still qualified to perform the duties of the position.

(5) If they left a full-time position, they made application
 for reemployment within 40 days of being released from service. If they left part-time employment,
 they made application for reemployment within five days of being released from service.

(c) If any employer fails or refuses to comply with this section, the superior court of the county in which the employer maintains a place of business may, upon the filing of a motion, petition, or other appropriate pleading by the person entitled to the benefits of this section, specifically require the employer to comply with this section and compensate the person for any loss of wages or benefits suffered by reason of the employer’s unlawful action. The court shall order a speedy hearing and shall advance it on the calendar. Upon application to the district attorney of the county in which the employer maintains a place of business by any person claiming to be entitled to the benefits of this section, the district attorney, if
 reasonably satisfied that the person is entitled to these benefits, shall appear and act as attorney for the person in the amicable adjustment of the claim or in the filing of any motion, petition, or other appropriate pleading and the prosecution thereof to specifically require the employer to comply with this section. Fees or court costs shall not be required to be paid by the person applying for these benefits.

(d) Upon application to the city prosecutor of the city in which the employer maintains a place of business by any person claiming to be entitled to the benefits of this section, the city prosecutor, if reasonably satisfied that the person is entitled to these benefits, may appear and act as attorney for the person in the amicable adjustment of the claim or in the filing of any motion, petition, or other appropriate pleading and
 the prosecution thereof to specifically require the employer to comply with this section. Fees or court costs shall not be required to be paid by the person applying for these benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 34.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

395.07.

(a) In addition to the benefits provided pursuant to Sections 395.01 and 395.02, any officer or employee of the legislative, executive, or judicial department of the state, who, as a member of the California National Guard or a United States Military Reserve organization, is called into active duty as a result of the Iraq-Kuwait crisis on or after August 2, 1990, shall have the benefits provided for in subdivision (b).

(b) Any officer or employee to which subdivision (a) applies, while on active duty, shall, with respect to active duty served on or after August 2, 1990, receive from the state, for a period not to exceed 180 calendar days, as part
 of their compensation, both of the following:

(1) The difference between the amount of their military pay and allowances and the amount the officer or employee would have received as a state officer or employee, including any merit raises which would otherwise have been granted during the time the individual was on active duty.

(2) All benefits that they would have received had they not been called to active duty unless the benefits are prohibited or limited by vendor contracts.

(c) Any individual receiving compensation pursuant to subdivision (b) who does not return to state service within 60 days of being released from active duty shall have that compensation treated as a loan payable with interest at the rate
 earned on the Pooled Money Investment Account. This subdivision shall not apply to compensation received pursuant to Section 395.02.

(d) This section shall not apply to any active duty served voluntarily after the close of the Iraq-Kuwait crisis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 35.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

395.08.

(a) In addition to the benefits provided pursuant to Sections 395.01 and 395.02, any officer or employee of the legislative, executive, or judicial department of the state, who, as a member of the California National Guard or a United States Military Reserve organization, is called into active duty as a result of the Bosnia crisis on or after November 21, 1995, shall have the benefits provided for in subdivision (b).

(b) Any officer or employee to which subdivision (a) applies, while on active duty, shall, with respect to active duty served on or after November 21, 1995, as a result of the Bosnia crisis, receive from the state, for a period not to exceed
 180 calendar days, as part of their compensation, both of the following:

(1) The difference between the amount of their military pay and allowances and the amount the officer or employee would have received as a state officer or employee, including any merit raises that would otherwise have been granted during the time the individual was on active duty.

(2) All benefits that they would have received had
 they not been called to active duty unless the benefits are prohibited or limited by vendor contracts.

(c) Any individual receiving compensation pursuant to subdivision (b) who does not return to state service within 60 days of being released from active duty shall have that compensation treated as a loan payable with interest at the rate earned on the Pooled Money Investment Account. This subdivision shall not apply to compensation received pursuant to Section 395.02.

(d) This section shall not apply to any active duty served voluntarily after the close of the Bosnia crisis.

(e) Benefits provided under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall only be provided to an employee who was not eligible to participate
 in the federal Ready Reserve Mobilization Income Insurance Program (10 U.S.C. Sec. 12521 et seq.) or a successor federal program that, in the determination of the Director of Personnel Administration, is substantively similar to the federal Ready Reserve Mobilization Income Insurance Program. For an employee eligible to participate in the federal Ready Reserve Mobilization Income Insurance Program or a successor program, and whose monthly salary as a state employee was higher than the sum of their military pay and allowances and the maximum allowable benefit under the federal Ready Reserve Mobilization Income Insurance Program or a successor program, the employee shall receive the amount payable under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), but that amount shall be reduced by the maximum allowable benefit under the federal Ready Reserve Mobilization Income Insurance Program or a successor program. For
 individuals who elected the federal Ready Reserve Mobilization Income Insurance Program the state shall reimburse for the cost of the insurance premium for the period of time on active duty, not to exceed 180 calendar days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 36.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

395.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any officer or employee of the state not subject to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 19770) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any public officer, deputy, assistant, or employee of any city, county, city and county, school district, water district, irrigation district, or any other district, political corporation, political subdivision, or governmental agency thereof who, in time of war or national emergency as proclaimed by the President or Congress, or when any of the Armed Forces of the United States are serving outside of the United States or their territories pursuant to order or request of the United Nations, or while any national conscription act is in effect, leaves or has left their office or position prior to the end of the war, or the
 termination of the national emergency or during the effective period of any order or request of this type of the United Nations or prior to the expiration of the National Conscription Act, to join the Armed Forces of the United States and who does or did without unreasonable and unnecessary delay join the Armed Forces or, being a member of any reserve force or corps of any of the Armed Forces of the United States or of the militia of this state, is or was ordered to duty therewith by competent military authority and served or serves in compliance with those orders, shall have a right, if released, separated or discharged under conditions other than dishonorable, to return to and reenter upon the office or position within six months after the termination of their active service with the Armed Forces, but not later than six months after the end of the war or national emergency or military or police operations under the United Nations or after the Governor finds and proclaims that, for the purposes of this
 section, the war, national emergency, or United Nations military or police operation no longer exists, or after the expiration of the National Conscription Act, if the term for which they were elected or appointed has not ended during their absence; provided, that the right to return to and reenter upon the office or position shall not extend to or be granted to any officer or employee of the state not subject to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 19770) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any public officer, deputy, assistant, or employee of any city, county, city and county, school district, water district, irrigation district or any other district, political corporation, political subdivision or governmental agency thereof, who shall fail to return to and reenter upon their office or position within 12 months after the first date upon which they could terminate or could cause to have terminated their active service with the Armed Forces of the United States or of the militia of
 this state. They shall also have a right to return to and reenter upon the office or position during terminal leave from the Armed Forces and prior to discharge, separation, or release therefrom.

(b) (1) Upon return and reentry to the office or employment, the officer or employee shall have all of the rights and privileges in, connected with, or arising out of the office or employment which they would have enjoyed if they had not been absent therefrom; provided, however, the officer or employee shall not be entitled to sick leave, vacation, or salary for the period during which they were on leave from that governmental service and in the service of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) If the office or position has been abolished or otherwise has ceased to exist during their absence, they shall be reinstated in a position of like seniority, status, and
 pay if the position exists, or to a comparable vacant position for which they are qualified.

(c) Any officer or employee other than a probationer who is restored to their office or employment pursuant to this act shall not be discharged from that office or position without cause within one year after the restoration, and shall be entitled to participate in insurance or other benefits offered by the employing governmental agency pursuant to established rules and practices relating to those officers or employees on furlough or leave of absence in effect at the time the officer or employee left their office or position to join the Armed Forces of the United States.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, any enlisted person who was involuntarily ordered to active duty (other than for training) for a stated duration shall not lose any right or benefit conferred under
 this code if they voluntarily elect to complete the period of that duty.

(e) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 137.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

395.2.

Any employee of a board of school trustees or board of education in a position not requiring certification qualifications who enters the active military service of the United States of America or of the State of California, including active service in any uniformed auxiliary of, or to, any branch of such military service created or authorized as such auxiliary by the Congress of the United States of America or by the Legislature of the State of California, or in the full time paid service of the American Red Cross, during any period of National emergency declared by the President of the United States of America or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, shall regain all rights to his position and shall be reinstated thereto upon his application at any time within six months of the termination of that service, but in any event within one year from the date of a treaty of peace terminating the hostilities in which the United States is now engaged. The provisions of this act shall apply to service in the Merchant Marine as that phrase is now defined in any Federal statute relating to reemployment rights of persons in service in the Merchant Marine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1946, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

395.3.

(a) In the event that any public officer or employee has resigned or resigns their office or employment to serve or to continue to serve in the Armed Forces of the United States or in the militia of this state, they shall have a right to return to and reenter the office or employment prior to the time at which their term of office or their employment would have ended if they had not resigned, on serving a written notice to that effect upon the authorized appointing power, or if there is no authorized appointing power, upon the officer or agency having power to fill a vacancy in the office or employment,
 within six months of the termination of their active service with the Armed Forces. The right to return and reenter upon the office or position shall not extend or be granted to any public officer or employee who fails to return to and reenter
 their office or position within 12 months after the first date upon which they could terminate or could cause to have terminated their active service with the Armed Forces of the United States or of the militia of this state.

(b) As used in this section, “public officers and employees” includes all of the following:

(1) Members of the Senate and of the Assembly.

(2) Justices of the Supreme Court and the courts of appeal, judges of the superior courts, and all other judicial officers.

(3) All other state officers and employees not within Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 19770) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including
 all officers for whose
 selection and term of office provision is made in the California Constitution and laws of this state.

(4) All officers and employees of any county, city and county, city, township, district, political subdivision, authority, commission, board, or other public agency within this state.

(c) The right of reentry into public office or employment provided for in this section shall include the right to be restored to the civil service status as the officer or employee would have if they had not so resigned. Another person shall not acquire civil service status in the same position so as to deprive the officer or employee of their right to restoration as provided for herein.

(d) This section shall be
 retroactively applied to extend the right
 of reentry into public office or employment to public officers and employees who resigned prior to its effective date.

(e) This section does not apply to any public officer or employee to whom the right to reenter public office or employment after service in the Armed Forces has been granted by any other law.

(f) If any provision of this section, or the application of this section to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this section, or the application of this section to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby.

(g) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of
 understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 38.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

395.4.

Whenever the United States is engaged in war or whenever the Governor finds and proclaims that an emergency exists in preparing for the National defense, any employee or officer, other than an elected officer, of a county, city, political subdivision, school, irrigation, public district, or other local authority or public body whatsoever who enters the armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to a leave of absence for service with such armed forces for the duration of the war or until the Governor finds and proclaims that the emergency no longer exists, and for 90 days thereafter, or until 90 days after the termination of such service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

395.5.

(a) The Military Department shall comply with the provisions of Section 4301 of Title 38 of the United States Code, the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act (USERRA).

(b) For purposes of USERRA, Military Department personnel who are on state active duty and are deployed, mobilized, or otherwise subject to any federal active service under voluntary or involuntary conditions, shall be considered employees and provided the same federal reemployment protections and benefits given to other employees under USERRA.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 680, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

395.6.

(a) The Governor may appoint a mediator in their office to take complaints, regarding possible violations or other issues dealing with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act (38 U.S.C. Sec. 4301 et seq.), hereafter USERRA, and Section 395.06, and to resolve and coordinate the resolution of those complaints or issues, from state employees who satisfy both of the following:

(1) Are members of either of the following:

(A) The California National Guard.

(B) A reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) Encounter problems regaining their state position when they return from service in the California National Guard or from service in a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces.

(b) Each state agency and department may appoint a mediator to take complaints, regarding possible violations of USERRA and other issues relating to state pay, and to resolve and coordinate the resolution of those complaints with, if necessary, the assistance of the Governor-appointed ombudsman, from employees of that department or agency who are members of either the
 California National Guard or a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(c) Mediators appointed under the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) shall become knowledgeable about USERRA law and, to the extent possible, work with the California Committee for Employer Support of the Guard and Reserve, a Department of Defense organization, and the California National Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 39.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

395.8.

Any officer, elective or otherwise, who leaves or shall have left the service of any city in order to enter upon active service with the armed forces of the United States shall be reinstated and restored to his office upon his discharge or release from such active service with the armed forces; provided, such discharge or release is prior to the expiration of the term for which he has been elected or appointed.

The rights created by this section shall have no application to any officer who shall have been dishonorably discharged or released from such armed forces, or shall have been so mentally or physically disabled as to be incapable of performing the duties of his office or shall fail to present himself to the legislative body or other appointing authority of such city ready and willing to assume the duties of his office, within six months from the time of his discharge or release from active service with the armed forces.

The office from which such officer absents himself to enter upon active service with the armed forces shall not be considered to be vacant but the legislative body or other appointing authority, as the case may be, may appoint an officer to temporarily replace any such officer so absenting himself to enter upon active service with the armed forces. Such temporary officers shall have all of the powers and duties of the office to which he may be temporarily appointed and shall hold said office until the expiration of the term thereof or until the officer returns from service with the armed forces, whichever event first occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1946, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

395.9.

Any public employee and any employee of a corporation, company, firm, or other person who is a member of the State Guard is entitled to a temporary military leave of absence without pay while engaged in military duty for purposes of military training, drills, unit training assemblies, or similar inactive duty training for not to exceed 15 calendar days annually, including time involved in going to and returning from that duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 22.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

395.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified employer shall allow a qualified employee to take up to 10 days of unpaid leave during a qualified leave period.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Period of military conflict” means either of the following:

(A) A period of war declared by the United States Congress.

(B) A period of deployment for which a member of a reserve component is ordered to active duty pursuant to either of the following:

(i) Sections 12301 and 12302 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(ii) Title 32 of the United States Code.

(2) “Qualified employee” means a person who satisfies all of the following:

(A) Is the spouse of a qualified member.

(B) Performs service for hire for an employer for an average of 20 or more hours per week, but does not include an independent contractor.

(C) Provides the qualified employer with notice, within two business days of receiving official notice that the qualified member will be on leave from deployment, of their
 intention to take the leave provided for in subdivision (a).

(D) Submits written documentation to the qualified employer certifying that the qualified member will be on leave from deployment during the time the leave provided for in subdivision (a) is requested.

(3) “Qualified employer” includes any individual, corporation, company, firm, state, city, county, city and county, municipal corporation, district, public authority, or any other governmental subdivision, that employs 25 or more employees.

(4) “Qualified member” means a person who is any of the following:

(A) A member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has been deployed during a
 period of military conflict to an area designated as a combat theater or combat zone by the President of the United States.

(B) A member of the National Guard who has been deployed during a period of military conflict.

(C) A member of the Reserves who has been deployed during a period of military conflict.

(5) “Qualified leave period” means the period during which the qualified member is on leave from deployment during a period of military conflict.

(c) A qualified employer shall not retaliate against a qualified employee for requesting or taking the leave provided for in this section.

(d) The leave provided for in this section shall not affect or prevent a qualified employer from allowing a qualified employee to take a leave that the qualified employee is otherwise entitled to take.

(e) This section shall not affect a qualified employee’s rights with respect to any other employee benefit provided for in other laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 40.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

396.

The commanding officer of any portion of the militia parading or performing any military duty in any street or highway may require persons in such street or highway to yield the right of way to such militia, except that the carriage of the United States mail, the legitimate functions of the police, and the progress and operations of hospital ambulances, fire engines, and fire departments and apparatus shall not be interfered with thereby.

Any person who hinders, delays, or obstructs any portion of the militia parading or performing any military duty, or who attempts so to do, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

397.

When an emergency has been declared to exist by the Governor and during the continuance thereof, any person belonging to the military or naval forces of the State or of the United States shall, together with his conveyance, personal baggage, and the military property of the State or of the United States in his charge, be allowed to pass free through all tollgates and over all toll bridges and all ferries, if he presents an order for duty in the military or naval service of the State or of the United States. The provisions of this section do not apply to any tollgate, toll bridge or ferry owned or operated by any private individual, corporation or utility, or owned or operated by any municipal corporation or bridge and highway district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

398.

Any person who trespasses upon any campground, armory, airport, or other place devoted to military duty, or who in any way or manner interrupts or molests the orderly discharge of military duty, or who disturbs or prevents the passage of troops going to or returning from any duty is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be placed under arrest by or at the direction of the commanding officer of the troops or of the place concerned. The Adjutant General may cause any place to be declared “off limits” to members of the National Guard if necessary to protect the health, safety, morals or general welfare of such members during such times as the National Guard may be on active duty or in attendance at an encampment, maneuvers or extended exercise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

399.

(a) (1) The Secretary of the California Department of Veterans Affairs, or their designees, shall assist any eligible member or veteran who returns or has returned to this state in obtaining a best practice health screening test for exposure to depleted uranium. The screening should consist of a bioassay procedure capable of detecting depleted uranium at low levels and discriminating between different uranium isotopes. State funds shall not be used to pay for the tests or any other federal treatment services.

(2) The eligible member or veteran must return or have returned to this state after service in an area where depleted
 uranium was used or that was designated as a combat zone by the President of the United States after 1990. The eligible member or veteran shall either be assigned a risk level I, II, or III for depleted uranium exposure by their branch of service, be referred by a military physician, or have reason to believe that they were exposed to depleted uranium during their
 service.

(b) (1) In order to effectively provide the assistance required by subdivision (a), the Secretary of the California Department of Veterans Affairs, or their designees, shall develop and implement a plan for outreach to eligible members and veterans who have returned from combat areas where depleted uranium was used.

(2) The outreach plan shall provide information to eligible members and veterans concerning their potential exposure to depleted uranium, the possible hazards associated with exposure, and the right to federal depleted uranium screening services.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Eligible member” means a member who served in the Persian Gulf War, as defined in Section 101 of Title 38 of the United States Code, in an area designated as a combat zone by the President of United States during Operation Enduring Freedom or Operation Iraqi Freedom, or in any other combat theater where depleted uranium was used.

(2) “Member” or “member of the Armed Forces” means a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, including the California National Guard, who is a resident of this state.

(3) “Military physician” means a provider who is under contract with the United States Department of Defense to provide physician services to members of the Armed Forces.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 41.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

399.5.

(a) (1) The Secretary of the California Department of Veterans Affairs, or their designees, shall assist any eligible member or veteran who returns or has returned to this state in obtaining an appropriate health screening test for traumatic brain injury and post-traumatic stress disorder.

(2) The eligible member or veteran must return or have returned to this state after service.

(b) (1) In order to effectively provide the assistance required by subdivision (a), the Secretary of the California Department of Veterans Affairs, or their designees, shall develop and implement
 a plan for outreach to eligible members and veterans who have returned from combat. The Adjutant General, or their designee, shall also develop and implement a plan for outreach to eligible members of the California National Guard who have returned from combat and remain on duty in order to effectively provide the service required by subdivision (a).

(2) Each outreach plan shall provide information to eligible members and veterans concerning traumatic brain injury and post-traumatic stress disorder, the possible impacts associated with traumatic brain injury and post-traumatic stress disorder, and the right to screening services.

(c) For purposes of this section, both of the following apply:

(1) “Eligible member” means
 a member who served under Title 10 of the United States Code as designated by Executive Orders Nos. 12744 and 13239 of the President of the United States.

(2) “Member” or “member of the Armed Forces” means a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, including the California National Guard, who is a resident of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 42.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Protections [400. - 409.15.]

400.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Armed Forces” means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, and Coast Guard.

(b) “Military orders,” with respect to a service member, means official military orders, or any notification, certification, or verification from the service member’s commanding officer with respect to the service member’s current or future military duty status.

(c) “Military service” means, as to a member of the militia, full-time active state service or full-time active federal service. As
 to a person who is not a member of the militia, “military service” means full-time active duty for a period in excess of seven days in any 14-day period.

(d) “Service member” means all of the following:

(1) A member of the militia, as defined in Section 120, called or ordered into active state or federal service pursuant to Section 143 or 146 or federal law.

(2) A member of an active or reserve component of the Armed Forces who is ordered into active duty pursuant to federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 13.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

(a) Application by a service member for, or receipt by a service member of, a stay, postponement, or suspension pursuant to this chapter in the payment of any tax, fine, penalty, insurance premium, or other civil obligation or liability of that person shall not itself, without regard to other considerations, provide the basis for any of the following:

(1) A determination by any lender or other person that the service member is unable to pay any civil obligation or liability in accordance with its terms.

(2) With respect to a credit transaction between a creditor and the service member, any of the following:

(A) A denial or revocation of
 credit by the creditor.

(B) A change by the creditor in the terms of an existing credit arrangement.

(C) A refusal by the creditor to grant credit to the service member in substantially the amount or on substantially the terms requested.

(3) An adverse report relating to the creditworthiness of the service member by or to any person or entity engaged in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information.

(4) A refusal by an insurer to insure the service member.

(5) An annotation in a service member’s record by a creditor or a person engaged in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information identifying the service member as a member of the active
 militia, as defined in Section 120, or an active or reserve component of the Armed Forces.

(b) A person shall not, in connection with the collection of any obligation, including any debt or payment, falsely claim to be a member or civilian employee of the Armed Forces, a component of the active militia, as defined in Section 120, the Department of Defense, the Department of Homeland Security, or the Military Department, or identify themselves through the use of any military rank, rating, or title.

(c) A person shall not, in connection with the collection of any obligation, including any debt or payment, from a member of the active militia, as defined in Section 120, or a member of an active or reserve component of the Armed Forces, contact the member’s military unit or chain of command without the written consent of the member given after the obligation becomes due and
 payable.

(d) A person shall not, in connection with any transaction or any sale of goods or services, electronically access a Common Access Card (CAC) issued to a service member, place or require the placement of such a CAC in a smart card reader, request or request entry of the personal identification number (PIN) associated with such a CAC, or require a service member to log in to any Department of Defense or, in the case of a member of the Coast Guard, Department of Homeland Security computer system. A transaction or sale entered into in violation of this subdivision is void.

(e) (1) A person shall not condition the receipt of a military or veteran discount, in any form, on the waiver by a recipient of the discount of any right the person has under state or federal law. Any such waiver is void.

(2) Any other waiver of a right provided to service members, former service members, or their dependents by this code is void.

(f) Any person violating any provision of this section is liable for actual damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs incurred by the injured party.

(g) Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by imprisonment not to exceed one year or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.   (SB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

402.
